Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1540.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 47BUY AMERICA, BUY UNION GRANTSSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. ProgramC. FundD. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONS123456789101112131415161718 Sec.4701. Scope of chapter.4702. Definitions.§ 4701. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the award of Buy America, Buy Union grants.§ 4702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." As defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 5602 (relating to definitions)."Bus." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Business entity." A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, association, estate, trust, foundation or similar entity."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Buy America, Buy Union Grant Fund established under section 4721 (relating to establishment of fund)."Labor organization." As follows:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), as defined in section 3(f) of the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act.(2) The term does not include an organization in which more than one-half of the employees of the organization are owners, officers or executives of the organization."Passenger car." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102."Procure." As follows:20250HB1540PN1811 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) To acquire by purchase, lease or rent.(2) The term does not include acquiring by lease or rent if the term of the lease or rental is less than one month."Program." The Buy America, Buy Union Grant Program established under section 4711 (relating to establishment of program)."School bus." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102."School vehicle." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102."Truck." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102."Union-made." Assembled, as part of the final step in the manufacturing process to create a finished product, at a plant, factory or other site of a business entity, which is:(1) located in the United States; and(2) operating under a bona fide collective bargaining agreement negotiated by a bona fide labor organization."Vehicle." Any of the following:(1) A bus.(2) A passenger car.(3) A school bus.(4) A school vehicle.(5) A truck.SUBCHAPTER BPROGRAMSec.4711. Establishment of program.4712. Operation of program.4713. Application.4714. Limitations.4715. Determination.§ 4711. Establishment of program.20250HB1540PN1811 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Buy America, Buy Union Grant Program is established within the department.§ 4712. Operation of program.The department shall implement and administer the program for the purpose of providing grants in accordance with this chapter to reimburse political subdivisions and authorities that procure vehicles which are union-made.§ 4713. Application.(a) Form.--(1) The department shall develop an application form for political subdivisions and authorities to use to seek a grant under the program.(2) The application form under paragraph (1) may specify the vehicles that would be eligible for a grant under the program.(3) The department shall post the application form under paragraph (1) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(b) Contents.--An applicant seeking a grant under the program shall provide the following information to the department:(1) The name and contact information of the applicant.(2) The amount of the grant requested.(3) The number of vehicles which are union-made for which a grant under the program is sought, including a description of the vehicles.(4) Evidence of procurement and union-made status.(5) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(c) Submittal.--The department shall prescribe the process 20250HB1540PN1811 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to submit completed application forms for consideration, including deadlines for submittal.§ 4714. Limitations.(a) Amount of grants.--The amount of a grant under the program for an applicant shall be limited to not more than 20% of the costs incurred by the applicant regarding the procurement of the vehicles which are union-made.(b) Distribution of grants.--Grants under the program shall be disbursed on a first-come, first-served basis determined by the department and until all money in the fund is exhausted.§ 4715. Determination.(a) Review.--The department shall review each completed application for a grant under the program and shall determine whether to award the grant.(b) Notice.--The department shall provide notice of the determination under subsection (a). The following shall apply regarding the notice:(1) If the department awards the grant, the department shall include the amount of the grant and any conditions on the use of the grant.(2) If the department does not award the grant in whole or in part, the department shall include the reasons for the full or partial denial.SUBCHAPTER CFUNDSec.4721. Establishment of fund.4722. Operation of fund.4723. Funding source.§ 4721. Establishment of fund.20250HB1540PN1811 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Buy America, Buy Union Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury to carry out the purposes of the program.§ 4722. Operation of fund.(a) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest and other earnings on the money in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to award grants under the program.(b) End of fiscal year.--Any money remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year, including interest and other earnings, shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.§ 4723. Funding source.The department may accept funding for the program, including money appropriated by the General Assembly, Federal money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source, which shall be deposited into the fund.SUBCHAPTER DMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.4731. Reports.4732. Costs.4733. Guidelines.§ 4731. Reports.(a) Annual reports required.--No later than September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall issue an annual report detailing the operation of the program and fund during the preceding year.(b) Contents.--Each annual report under this section must include the following:(1) The number of applicants that sought a grant under 20250HB1540PN1811 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the program, including the total amount of the grants sought under the program.(2) The number of applicants that received a grant under the program, including the amount of the grant that each applicant received under the program.(3) The number of applicants that were denied, in whole or in part, a grant under the program, including the reasons for the full or partial denial.(4) The money remaining in the fund.(5) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(c) Transmittal.--Each annual report under this section shall be transmitted to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Posting.--The department shall post each annual report under this section on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.§ 4732. Costs.The department shall use money appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of implementing and administering the program.§ 4733. Guidelines.The department shall develop and periodically review guidelines necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1540PN1811 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930